Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE F. OTHER COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES

CHAPTER 114. CHIROPRACTIC COLLEGE

Sec. 114.001. CHIROPRACTIC COLLEGE.

Text of section effective upon agreement to transfer of Texas Chiropractic College

(a) The chiropractic college formerly constituting the Texas Chiropractic College, operated as a nonprofit corporation and transferred to the state pursuant to an Act of the 76th Legislature, Regular Session, 1999, is a component of the higher education institution to which the Texas Chiropractic College was transferred under that Act and is under the management and control of the governing board of that institution of higher education.

(b) The governing board has the same powers and duties concerning the institution as are conferred on it by law concerning any component institution of the institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 404, Sec. 9; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1569, Sec. 9.

Sec. 114.002. POWERS OF THE BOARD.

Text of section effective upon agreement to transfer of Texas Chiropractic College

(a) The governing board may:

(1) provide for the training and teaching of students seeking to become:

(A) chiropractors; or

(B) other technicians who provide services related to the practice of chiropractic medicine;

(2) prescribe courses leading to degrees customarily offered in other leading United States chiropractic schools;

(3) award the degrees described by Subdivision (2);

(4) enter into an affiliation or coordinating agreement with an entity if reasonably necessary or desirable for the operation of a first-class school of chiropractic medicine;

(5) make joint appointments with another institution of higher education; and

(6) adopt rules for the operation, control, and management of the institution as necessary for the operation of a first-class school of chiropractic medicine, including rules governing the number of students that may be admitted to any program at the institution.

(b) The salary of a person who received a joint appointment under Subsection (a)(5) must be apportioned among the institutions to which the individual is appointed on the basis of the services rendered.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 404, Sec. 9; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1569, Sec. 9.